Tennessee, session 114, SB0944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-202, is amended by deleting
subdivision (g)(1) and substituting:
(1) Cruelty to animals is a Class A misdemeanor, and must be punished by at
least forty (40) hours of community service work to be determined by the court, in
addition to any punishment authorized by § 40-35-111.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0944
003185
- 1 -